Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
CHAPTER 274 Professional Service Corporations

274.005.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Foreign professional service corporation” means a corporation for profit organized for the purpose of rendering professional services under a law other than the law of this state;

“Professional service” means any type of personal service to the public which requires as a condition precedent to the rendering of such service the obtaining of a license or other legal authorization and which, prior to the passage of this chapter and by reason of law or a professional code of ethics, could not be performed by a corporation. The personal services which come within the provisions of this chapter are the personal services rendered by but not limited to certified public accountants, public accountants, chiropractors, osteopaths, physicians and surgeons, doctors of medicine, doctors of dentistry, podiatrists, chiropodists, architects, veterinarians, optometrists, and attorneys-at-law;

“Professional service corporation” means a corporation organized under this chapter;

“Qualified person” means a natural person, partnership, limited liability company, or professional service corporation which is eligible under this chapter to own shares issued by a professional service corporation; and

“Regulating board” means the governmental agency which is charged by law with the licensing and regulation of the practice of the profession which the professional service corporation is organized to render.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 236, §
1; 1980, ch. 288, §
9, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 341, §
19, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 149, §
230, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 137, §
86, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 86, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Professional services may be rendered through a corporation and any provision to the contrary found in any professional code of ethics is unenforceable and void as to any corporation formed under and complying with the requirements of KRS Ch. 274.

OAG 63-13

.

A professional service corporation set up by practicing attorneys pursuant to KRS ch. 274 would not be in conflict with the rules of the Court of Appeals.

OAG 63-1110

.

Although this chapter does not expressly prohibit the qualification of foreign professional service corporations, a proper construction renders it inapplicable to foreign professional service corporations.

OAG 74-522

.

The practice of physical therapy is a profession included within the scope of subsection (2) of this section.

OAG 74-522

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Whiteside, Self-Employed Individuals Retirement Act of 1962, Prospects for Self-Employed Plans, 51 Ky. L.J. 325 (1962).

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

274.010.
Transfer of stock. [Repealed.]

274.015.
Professional service corporation authorized — Articles of incorporation requirements — Authority — Amendment of articles to become business corporation.

One (1) or more individuals, each of whom is licensed to render the same professional service or who are licensed to render related professional services such that applicable licensing laws and regulations would not prohibit the practice of such multiple professional services through a single business partnership, may incorporate and form a professional service corporation by filing articles of incorporation in the office of the Secretary of State. Such articles of incorporation shall meet the requirements of KRS Chapter 271B, and in addition to the information required by KRS

271B.2-020

, such articles shall contain the following:

The designation of the profession or professions to be practiced through the professional service corporation;

The names and residence addresses of all the original shareholders of the professional service corporation; and

A statement by the incorporator or incorporators that each of the incorporators, shareholders, not less than one-half (1/2) of the directors, and each of the officers other than secretary and treasurer is a qualified person within the meaning of this chapter.

A professional service corporation formed under the provisions of this chapter, except as this chapter may otherwise provide, shall have the same powers, authority, duties, and liabilities as a corporation formed under, and shall be otherwise governed by, KRS Chapter 271B.

A professional service corporation that has ceased to be utilized for rendering a professional service may by amendment of its articles of incorporation delete those provisions otherwise required by subsection (1) of this section and adopt a name conforming to KRS

271B.4-010

, whereupon the corporation shall be governed exclusively by KRS Chapter 271B and not this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 236, §
2; 1972, ch. 274, §
153; 1980, ch. 288, §
10, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 23, §
181, effective January 1, 1989; 1988, ch. 224, §
24, effective July 15, 1988; 2007, ch. 137, §
87, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 87, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 133, § 24, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 133, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict; therefore, they have been codified together.

274.017.
Restricted issuance and transfer of shares.

A professional service corporation may issue and a shareholder thereof may transfer or pledge shares, fractional shares, and rights or options to purchase shares only to:

A natural person who is authorized by law in this state or in any other state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia to render a professional service permitted by the articles of incorporation of the corporation;

A partnership, domestic or foreign, in which all the partners are qualified persons with respect to such professional corporation and in which at least one (1) partner is authorized by the laws of this state to render a professional service permitted by the articles of incorporation of the corporation;

A professional limited liability company, domestic or foreign, authorized by law in this state to render a professional service permitted by the articles of organization of the limited liability company and the articles of incorporation of the corporation; or

A professional service corporation, domestic or foreign, authorized by law in this state to render a professional service permitted by the articles of incorporation of each corporation.

Any issuance, transfer, or pledge of shares, fractional shares, or rights or options to purchase shares in violation of this section shall be void; however, nothing herein contained shall prohibit the transfer of shares of a professional corporation by operation of law or court decree.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 288, §
6, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 341, §
20, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 149, §
231, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 137, §
88, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 88, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 133, § 25, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 133, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict; therefore, they have been codified together.

274.019.
Proxy — Voting trust.

No proxy for shares of a professional service corporation shall be valid unless it shall be given to a qualified person. A voting trust with respect to shares of a professional service corporation shall not be valid unless all the trustees and beneficiaries thereof are qualified persons, except that a voting trust may be validly continued for a period of ten (10) months after the death of a deceased beneficiary or for a period of five (5) months after a beneficiary has become a disqualified person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 288, §
1, effective July 15, 1980; 2007, ch. 137, §
89, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 89, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

274.020.
Legal capacity not enlarged. [Repealed.]

274.025.
Number of directors. [Repealed.]

274.027.
Qualifications of officers and members of board — Voting.

Not less than one-half (1/2) of the directors of a professional service corporation and all the officers other than the secretary and the treasurer shall be qualified persons with respect to the corporation.

Those members of the board of directors of a professional service corporation not qualified within the meaning of KRS

274.015

shall abstain from voting on measures before the board which deal exclusively with the art of the professional service or services rendered as opposed to measures relating to the general business operation of the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 288, § 5, effective July 15, 1980.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

274.030.
Corporation rights reserved. [Repealed.]

274.035.
Requirement for participation. [Repealed.]

274.040.
Holder in good faith takes title. [Repealed.]

274.045.
Persons authorized to render service.

No professional service corporation provided for in this chapter may render professional services except through officers, employees and agents who are duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional services within this state. This provision shall not be interpreted to include in the term “employee” as used in this chapter, clerks, secretaries, bookkeepers, technicians and other assistants who are not usually and ordinarily considered by custom and practice to be rendering professional services to the public for which a license or other legal authorization is required.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 236, § 5.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An independent contractor seeking to attain the status of an agent for a professional service contractor, in order to perform services which the professional service corporation has been hired to perform, must meet the requirements of the first sentence of this section.

OAG 81-274

.

274.050.
Delivery of certificate. [Repealed.]

274.055.
Effect of chapter — Liability.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, KRS

271B.6-220

applies to a corporation governed by this chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not alter any law applicable to, or otherwise affect the fiducial, confidential or ethical relationship between a person rendering professional services and a person receiving such services. The corporation shall be jointly and severally liable, with the tortfeasor, to the full value of its assets for any negligent or wrongful acts or actionable misconduct committed by any of its officers, shareholders, agents or employees while they are engaged on behalf of the corporation in the rendering of professional service; provided, however, that no shareholder, director, officer or employee of a professional service corporation shall be personally liable for the negligence, wrongful acts, or actionable misconduct of any other shareholder, director, officer, agent or employee nor shall such shareholder, director, officer or employee be personally liable for the contractual obligations of the corporation.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of law, a corporation organized under this chapter may charge and collect fees for the professional services of its officers, directors, agents or employees, and may compensate those who render such professional services.

Notwithstanding KRS

14A.9-050

(3), any foreign professional service corporation granted a certificate of authority to conduct business within this state and those persons rendering professional services through it shall be subject to this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 236, § 6; 1980, ch. 288, § 11, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 133, § 26, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 29, § 12, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/8/2011). 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 29, sec. 24, provides that the amendments to this section in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 29, sec. 12, are retroactive to January 1, 2011.

274.060.
Indorsement of certificate. [Repealed.]

274.065.
Regulation of practice unaffected.

Nothing in this chapter shall restrict or limit in any manner the authority and duty of any regulating board of competent jurisdiction to license individual persons rendering professional services or to regulate the practice of the profession which is within the jurisdiction of such regulating board, even though such person is an officer, director, shareholder, or employee of a professional service corporation or engages in the practice of such profession through a professional service corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 236, §
7; 2007, ch. 137, §
90, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 90, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Professional services may be rendered through a corporation and any provision to the contrary found in any professional code of ethics is unenforceable and void as to any corporation formed under and complying with the requirements of KRS Chapter 274.

OAG 63-13

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

274.070.
Recission. [Repealed.]

274.075.
Corporate name — Advertising ethics maintained. [Repealed.]

274.077.
Name of professional service corporation. [Repealed.]

274.080.
Holder in good faith takes title. [Repealed.]

274.085.
Merger — Consolidation. [Repealed.]

274.087.
Merger or consolidation. [Repealed.]

274.090.
Delivery without indorsement. [Repealed.]

274.095.
Withdrawing shareholders — Procedure for redemption of stock — Procedure upon death of sole shareholder — Insolvency.

The articles of incorporation may provide for the purchase or redemption of all of the shares of any shareholder within a period not to exceed one (1) year after the death or disqualification to practice the profession of such shareholder, or for the purchase or redemption within said time of all of the shares of any shareholder desiring to sell them, all of whom are herein sometimes called “withdrawing shareholders” or, in default of such provisions in the articles of incorporation, the foregoing provisions and time limitation may be included in the bylaws of a professional service corporation, or, if no such provision and time limitation is made in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, they may be provided for by such private agreement or agreements as the shareholders and corporation may enter into. If such an article, bylaw or agreement is adopted or provided for and such stock is not redeemed by the corporation within said one (1) year period, then within ten (10) days following the end of said period the president and/or secretary of the corporation shall give notice thereof to the Secretary of State of Kentucky and, upon receipt of such notice by the Secretary of State, the charter of the corporation shall be immediately void.

In the absence of such provisions in the articles of incorporation, bylaws or by private agreement, a professional service corporation shall redeem the shares of a withdrawing shareholder within ninety (90) days after the death or disqualification of a shareholder or of the receipt by the corporation of written notice from a shareholder that he desires to sell or transfer all his shares of stock in the corporation upon terms mutually agreeable to the parties. Should a redemption not occur within the time limit provided herein, the shares shall immediately be cancelled on the books of the corporation and the holder of such shares shall be reimbursed as provided in subsection (4) of this section as a general creditor of the corporation.

If the sole shareholder of a professional service corporation organized pursuant to this chapter dies:

It shall be the duty of his personal representative to so notify the Secretary of State, whereupon the charter of such corporation shall lapse; or

The administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, or receiver of the estate of the deceased sole shareholder may amend the articles of incorporation by signing a written consent to such amendment. Articles of amendment to be adopted shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The amendments so adopted;

The date of adoption of the amendment by the administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, or receiver;

The number of shares outstanding; and

The number of shares held by the administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, or receiver.

The amendment to the articles of incorporation may allow the corporation to continue as a professional service corporation or may convert the corporation to a private business corporation provided, however, that the corporation shall not render professional services until such time as all outstanding shares are held by qualified persons and the corporation conforms to the provisions of this chapter; or

The administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, or receiver of the estate of the deceased shareholder shall transfer all outstanding shares of the corporation to other qualified persons or person within the meaning of this chapter. The professional service corporation shall cease to render professional services until such time as the transfer or transfers provided in this subsection are completed.

In the absence of an article, bylaw or agreement as provided for in subsection (1) of this section, or a sale as provided for within the time stated in subsection (2) of this section, a professional service corporation, within one hundred eighty (180) days after the death or disqualification of a shareholder or within the same period after receiving written notice from a shareholder that he desires the corporation to redeem all of his stock in the corporation, shall institute an equitable action for a determination of the fair market value of all of the shares of the corporation’s outstanding stock cancelled pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and owned by such shareholder.

The court shall designate a time for a hearing and at said hearing shall appoint a disinterested appraiser to determine the fair market, pre-cancellation value of such shares. The court shall administer an oath to the appraiser to honestly and faithfully discharge his duties and shall fix a time and place for the appraiser to begin hearing evidence on such fair market value. The appraiser shall have the powers conferred upon master commissioners by KRS

31A.010

and shall afford a reasonable opportunity to the corporation and the shareholder or personal representative of a deceased shareholder to introduce pertinent evidence on such fair market value. The appraiser shall conduct his hearings as expeditiously as practicable, and upon completion of the hearing shall report in writing to the court his determination of the fair market pre-cancellation value of such shares and shall file with the court a written transcript of the testimony heard by him, together with all exhibits introduced in evidence.

The corporation or any withdrawing shareholder may, within ten (10) days after the filing of the appraiser’s report, file exceptions thereto. Such exceptions shall be heard and decided by the court upon the evidence submitted to the appraiser as shown by the transcript. After hearing the exceptions to the appraiser’s report, or if no exceptions thereto have been filed within the time hereinbefore provided for, the court shall enter final judgment determining such fair market, pre-cancellation value of the shares of each withdrawing shareholder and shall direct payment thereof by the corporation to each withdrawing shareholder and the surrender of the duly indorsed certificate or certificates representing his shares. The court shall be empowered to direct payment by the corporation in installments reasonably calculated to avoid any impending corporate insolvency while reimbursing the withdrawing shareholder in as direct a manner as may be practicable.

If a professional service corporation fails to bring the above provided for action for the redemption of its shares within the time provided, then within ten (10) days after the end of said period, the president of the corporation, or if he be then dead, the secretary thereof, shall so notify, in writing, the Secretary of State of Kentucky, and upon receipt of such notice by the Secretary of State of Kentucky, the charter of the professional service corporation shall be void.

If the obligation of the corporation to redeem any shares of its outstanding stock as set out in subsections (1) to (5) of this section would render the corporation insolvent and the court has deemed an installment redemption as provided in subsection (4) of this section to be unwarranted, then without delay the corporation shall commence to liquidate and dissolve, unless the remaining shareholders shall have prior thereto purchased or redeemed all of the withdrawing shareholder’s shares or satisfied such shareholder’s claim against the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 236, § 10; 1968, ch. 166; 1980, ch. 188, § 240, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 288, § 12, effective July 15, 1980.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by two 1980 acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Booth and Rutledge, The Limited Liability Company
Act: Understanding Kentucky’s New Organizational Option, 83 Ky. L.J. 1 (1994-95).

274.100.
Transfer without delivery. [Repealed.]

274.105.
Contents of annual reports.

Each professional service corporation shall file an annual report as provided in KRS

14A.6-010

. A duplicate original copy of each annual report shall be filed with the regulating board which licenses the shareholders of the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 236, § 11; 1972, ch. 274, § 155; 1980, ch. 288, § 13, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 151, § 70, effective January 1, 2011.

274.110.
Warranties. [Repealed.]

274.115.
Business restrictions.

No professional service corporation organized or authorized to conduct business under this chapter shall engage in any business other than the rendering of the professional service or services for which it was specifically incorporated, provided, however, that nothing in this chapter or in any other provisions of existing law applicable to corporations shall be interpreted to prohibit such corporation from investing its funds in real estate, mortgages, stocks, bonds or any other type of investment, or from owning real or personal property necessary for the rendering of professional services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 236, § 12; 1980, ch. 288, § 14, effective July 15, 1980.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A business activity consisting of making arrangements whereby hospital emergency rooms are supplied with physicians who provide the necessary medical services and who are independent contractors vis-a-vis the Public Service Commission, does not constitute the practice of medicine; and, accordingly, a professional service corporation specifically incorporated to render the medical services of a physician may not lawfully engage in such activity.

OAG 79-295

.

274.120.
No warranty by pledgee. [Repealed.]

274.125.
Application of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to any person within this state who, prior to the passage of this chapter, was permitted to organize a corporation and perform professional services by the means of such corporation, and this chapter shall not apply to any corporation organized by such persons prior to the passage of this chapter, provided, that any such corporation may bring itself within the provisions of this chapter by amending its articles of incorporation in such a manner as to be consistent with all of the provisions of this chapter and by affirmatively stating in the amended articles of incorporation that the shareholders have elected to bring the corporation within, and have accepted the provisions of, this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 236, § 13.

274.130.
Levy or attachment; surrender of certificate. [Repealed.]

274.140.
Stock inures to creditor. [Repealed.]

274.150.
Liens of corporation. [Repealed.]

274.160.
Alterations. [Repealed.]

274.170.
Lost or destroyed certificates. [Repealed.]

274.180.
Law merchant governs. [Repealed.]

274.190.
Uniformity of construction. [Repealed.]

274.200.
Indorsement defined. [Repealed.]

274.210.
Certificate owner defined. [Repealed.]

274.220.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

274.230.
Application of chapter. [Repealed.]

274.240.
Citation. [Repealed.]

274.245.
Admission of foreign professional service corporation. [Repealed.]

274.250.
Application of foreign professional service corporation for a certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

274.255.
Revocation of certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

274.990.
Penalty.

Any person who fails or refuses to do any act or perform any duty required of him by this chapter, or who causes or permits a false statement to be included in the articles of incorporation of any professional service corporation, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for a period of not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 236, § 14.

274.991.
Additional penalties for violation of KRS 506.010, 506.030, 506.040, 521.020, or 521.050.

If a domestic professional service corporation is convicted of a violation of KRS

506.010

,

506.030

,

506.040

,

521.020

, or

521.050

, or if an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation violates any of those sections under circumstances which bring corporate liability under KRS 502.050(1)(b), the court shall order that the charter of the professional service corporation be suspended for a period of not more than five (5) years for a first offense, ten (10) years for a second offense, and permanently for a third or subsequent offense.

If a foreign professional service corporation is convicted of violating any section specified in subsection (1) of this section, or if an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation violates any of those sections under circumstances which bring corporate liability under KRS 502.050(1)(b), the court shall order that the professional service corporation not be permitted to do business in Kentucky for the appropriate period specified in subsection (1) of this section.

The penalties specified in this section shall be in addition to any other penalty specified by law for the commission of the offenses listed in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 477, § 9, effective July 15, 1994.